Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1708
Applicability of sections.

Sections 52-1701 to 52-1707 shall be applicable to any assignment instrument properly recorded prior to, on, or after February 17, 1993.

Laws 1993, LB 14, § 8.